Washington statutes.
RCW 11.120.050

Terms-of-service agreement.

(1) This chapter does not change or impair a right of a custodian or a user under a terms-of-service agreement to access and use digital assets of the user.

(2) This chapter does not give a fiduciary or a designated recipient any new or expanded rights other than those held by the user for whom, or for whose estate, the fiduciary or designated recipient acts or represents.

(3) A fiduciary's or designated recipient's access to digital assets may be modified or eliminated by a user, by federal law, or by a terms-of-service agreement if the user has not provided direction under RCW 11.120.040.

[ 2016 c 140 s 5.]